Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 5. Judicial Department
§ 3. Supreme court generally; original jurisdiction.

The supreme court shall have original jurisdiction in quo warranto and mandamus as to all state officers, and in habeas corpus. The supreme court shall also have power to issue writs of mandamus, review, prohibition, habeas corpus, certiorari, and other writs necessary and proper to the complete exercise of its appellate and revisory jurisdiction. Each of the judges shall have power to issue writs of habeas corpus to any part of the state upon petition by or on behalf of a person held in actual custody, and may make such writs returnable before himself or before the supreme court, or before any district court of the state or any judge thereof.

I. General Consideration.

II. Quo Warranto.

III. Mandamus.

IV. Habeas Corpus.

V. Writ Of Review.

VI. Prohibition.

VII. Certiorari.

I.General Consideration.

Cross references. —

As to habeas corpus and prerogative writs, see Rule 3, Sup. Ct.

As to writs of prohibition, see Rule 4, Sup. Ct.

Plenary power. —

The supreme court has plenary power to control course of litigation in trial courts. State ex rel. Jones v. District Court, 37 Wyo. 516, 263 P. 700,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1928).

Bail pending trial. —

Supreme court has jurisdiction, on question reserved thereto by district court, to determine if an accused should be admitted to bail pending trial. State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1895).

Order for supersedeas. —

If on motion for supersedeas a district court should refuse to act, or if an appellant should be otherwise prevented from obtaining a timely or effectual order from that court, or bond given should prove unavailing for some reason beyond appellant's control, or without his fault, an order by the supreme court after acquiring jurisdiction might become proper. Farmers' State Bank v. Haun, 29 Wyo. 322, 213 P. 361,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1923).

Injunctions. —

On review of an order denying a motion for injunction pendente lite, the supreme court has power to issue restraining order pending the proceeding in error. Weaver v. Richardson, 21 Wyo. 343, 132 P. 1148,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1913).

Supreme court has no jurisdiction to vacate or modify a temporary injunction issued by the district court, while cause is pending in such district court. Smith v. Healy, 12 Wyo. 218, 75 P. 430,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1904).

Vacating judgment and granting new trial. —

Where, after the institution of proceedings in error in criminal case, defendant was prevented, without fault on his part, from obtaining bill of exceptions through the accidental loss of the testimony by the official stenographer, and a bill of exceptions was necessary to a review of the errors assigned in the motion for a new trial, the supreme court had jurisdiction to vacate judgment and grant new trial. Richardson v. State, 15 Wyo. 465, 89 P. 1027,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1907).

Divorce cases. —

The supreme court on review may consider motion for the allowance of support of wife and child and reasonable expenses in a divorce action. Duxstad v. Duxstad, 16 Wyo. 396, 94 P. 463,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1908).

The supreme court may compel a husband, on his prosecuting a proceeding in error to a judgment for separate maintenance, to pay his wife reasonable sum for attorneys' fees in the appellate court. Brown v. Brown, 22 Wyo. 92, 135 P. 801,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1913).

Limitation on “other writs.” —

The words “necessary and proper to the complete exercise of its appellate and revisory jurisdiction,” in the second sentence, pertain to that which they modify, i.e. to “other writs,” and not to the writs specified in this section (including certiorari). Wright v. State, 670 P.2d 1090,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1983), reh'g denied, 707 P.2d 153,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 575

(Wyo. 1985).

Remedy for failure to set hearing. —

The proper remedy for a failure to set an adjudicatory hearing within the time constraints of
§§

14-6-209

and

14-6-226

is a motion to the juvenile court for a prompt hearing brought by the minor through the guardian ad litem, or brought by the parents, guardians or custodian named in the petition as parties to the proceeding; if such a motion is not acted upon in a timely fashion, then a petition for a writ of habeas corpus may be filed in the supreme court seeking release of the minor. In
In Interest of MFB, 860 P.2d 1140,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Thomas v. Justice Court, 538 P.2d 42,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1975); Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 563 P.2d 1382,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 254

(Wyo. 1977); Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990); Barker Bros. v. Barker-Taylor, 823 P.2d 1204,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1992); Saunders v. Hornecker, 2015 WY 34,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 5, 2015).

Quoted

in

Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Stated

in

Whiteley v. Meacham, 416 F.2d 36,

1969 U.S. App. LEXIS 10625

(10th Cir. 1969); State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State ex rel. R.R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(1947); State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965); State ex rel. Wyo. Ass'n of Consulting Eng'rs & Land Surveyors v. Sullivan, 798 P.2d 826,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For article, “Basic Appellate Practice: A Guide to Perfecting an Appeal in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 537 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases, State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Availability of writ of prohibition or similar remedy against acts of public prosecutor, 16 ALR4th 112.

Civil actions removable from state court to federal court under 28 U.S.C. § 1443, 159 ALR Fed 377.

II.Quo Warranto.

Quo warranto is limited to state officers,

when issued by the supreme court. In re Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850 (Wyo. 1893).

Contesting election of district judge. —

Original jurisdiction of supreme court in quo warranto for the purpose of contesting the election of district judge is not exclusive and should be exercised only in those cases where it is shown that it is necessary or proper that the writ should issue originally from supreme court. State ex rel. Walton v. Christmas, 48 Wyo. 239, 44 P.2d 905,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1935).

If quo warranto to contest the election of district judge should be filed in the district court, the judge, being disqualified, would be obliged to call in another judge and his refusal to do so would be ground for appropriate proceeding in supreme court to require him to do so. State ex rel. Walton v. Christmas, 48 Wyo. 239, 44 P.2d 905,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1935).

Legal right to office must affirmatively appear. —

In quo warranto to determine right and title to office, legal right of the relator to the office must affirmatively appear, without any presumption in favor of respondent who has forcibly obtained possession. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

III.Mandamus.

Supreme court has original jurisdiction in mandamus.

State ex rel. Wyoming Agric. College v. Irvine, 14 Wyo. 318, 84 P. 90,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1906), aff'd, 206 U.S. 278, 27 S. Ct. 613, 51 L. Ed. 1063, 1907 U.S. LEXIS 1163 (U.S. 1907).

Statute authorizing single judge to issue writ is valid. —

Statute allowing a single judge, in the first instance, to issue a writ of mandamus, was not repugnant to the constitution. State ex rel. Bennett v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 56, 32 P. 14,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1892).

Mandamus lies against all state officers. —

The power of the courts to compel “all state officers” to perform their duties is recognized in this section and § 10 of this article, which confer jurisdiction upon the courts in mandamus as to such officers. State ex rel. Whitehead v. Gage, 377 P.2d 299,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 66

(Wyo. 1963).

When court has power to issue writ not directed to state officer. —

Supreme court has power to issue writs of mandamus, except as to state officers, only in cases where such writs are necessary to complete exercise of appellate and revisory jurisdiction, since general words, followed by words of specific meaning, are limited in their application to matters of the same nature, included in the meaning of the specific words, and since any other construction would render the first clause of the section redundant, and of no effect.
State ex rel. School Dist. v. Clay, 3 Wyo. 393, 31 P. 409,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1890).

Compelling governor to perform ministerial duty. —

Supreme court has jurisdiction to issue mandamus to compel the governor to perform a ministerial duty. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

State auditor is subject to mandamus

under this section, and under sections of the statute relating to mandamus, where there is no adequate remedy at law. State ex rel. Jeffrey v. Burdick, 3 Wyo. 588, 28 P. 146,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1891).

As is the secretary of state. —

Mandamus will lie to compel the secretary of state to countersign and affix the seal of the state to an appointment made to state office by the governor. State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1893).

IV.Habeas Corpus.

Supreme court has been invested with original jurisdiction in habeas corpus

by the constitution. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

A writ of habeas corpus in all restraint cases, including child-custody cases, may be filed in the supreme court of Wyoming although the issuance of a similar writ may have been refused by a district court. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Showing required. —

While the supreme court has original jurisdiction to entertain applications for writs of habeas corpus pursuant to this section, it does not do so unless a showing is made of circumstances which render it necessary or proper that the writ if granted should issue originally from the supreme court. Ostwald v. State, 538 P.2d 1298,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 156

(Wyo. 1975).

Exhausting state remedies for federal habeas corpus purposes. —

A petitioner does not effect a fair presentation of a claim of ineffective assistance of appellate counsel, for federal habeas exhaustion purposes, by raising that issue for the first time in a petition for a writ of certiorari to the state supreme court to reinstate his direct appeal. Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366, 1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

Probable cause must be shown. —

The court is not bound, in the first instance, to issue the writ of habeas corpus as of course. Probable cause must first be shown to obtain it. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Inquiry into jurisdictional matters. —

One of the provisos of habeas corpus proceedings is to inquire into jurisdictional matters. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Unless a court has exceeded its jurisdiction, its decision is not subject to attack

by means of a writ of habeas corpus, no matter how erroneous it may appear. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Custody of infants. —

District court has unqualified jurisdiction to issue habeas corpus writs for the custody of infants. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Appeal available in child-custody cases. —

An appeal is available from action taken in a habeas corpus proceeding in child-custody cases. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

But denial of petition is nonappealable determination. —

Normally, a person may petition for a writ of habeas corpus again and again to the same or other courts, each denial thereof being a nonappealable determination. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Person illegally confined in insane asylum. —

Statute, providing a proceeding in the original court of commitment whereby one who has been adjudged insane, and who is alleged to have been restored to his right mind may have his restoration to capacity adjudged, does not divest the courts of jurisdiction to issue writs of habeas corpus in behalf of those illegally confined in an insane asylum. Byers v. Solier, 16 Wyo. 232, 93 P. 59,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1907).

V.Writ Of Review.

Jurisdiction remains inactive until statutory method of procedure prescribed. —

The jurisdiction of a writ of review, authorized by this section, for the purpose of a reexamination of issues of law and fact, remains inactive until a statutory method of procedure has been prescribed. Kelsey v. District Court, 22 Wyo. 297, 139 P. 433,

1914 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1914).

Writ proper. —

In defendant's aggravated assault case, where the district court concluded that the prosecution's conduct provided grounds for a mistrial, granted the defense motion, and dismissed the case with prejudice on the basis of speedy trial concerns, the State's writ of review was appropriate. The State had no other adequate remedy, the issues presented were of constitutional magnitude and public importance, and it was not established that allowing the writ would place defendant in jeopardy for a second time. State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

VI.Prohibition.

Nature of power. —

Power granted the supreme court to issue writs of prohibition has reference to the writ as known at common law, and is confined to cases where act sought to be prohibited is of a judicial nature. Dobson v. Westheimer, 5 Wyo. 34, 36 P. 626,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1894).

Object of a writ of prohibition

is to restrain the action of inferior courts in excess of their jurisdiction. State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966).

Writ of prohibition is most appropriately granted when the inferior court lacks subject-matter jurisdiction. State ex rel. Peterson v. District Court, 617 P.2d 1056,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1980).

A writ of prohibition is appropriate to prevent a district court from exercising subject-matter jurisdiction forbidden to it by federal law. State ex rel. Peterson v. District Court, 617 P.2d 1056,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1980).

Writ of prohibition is a discretionary writ

and not one of right.
State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966);
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Which is not favored. —

A writ of prohibition is not favored and is issued with caution.
State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966);
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

And it should not be issued if there is other adequate means of redress.

State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966).

A writ of prohibition is ordinarily granted only where there is no adequate remedy at law. State ex rel. Peterson v. District Court, 617 P.2d 1056,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 302

(Wyo. 1980).

A writ of prohibition is not granted if the petitioner has available some other plain, speedy and adequate remedy, which normally encompasses review on appeal after trial.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Since it is disruptive. —

A writ of prohibition results in a disruption of the usual course of legal proceedings.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Supreme court has jurisdiction to restrain by prohibition the action of inferior courts

in excess of their jurisdiction. State ex rel. Mau v. Ausherman, 11 Wyo. 410, 72 P. 200,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 11 Wyo. 410, 73 P. 548,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1903).

When supreme court to issue writ of prohibition. —

The supreme court will only exercise its power to issue a writ of prohibition in those circumstances where the trial court seeks to act without subject-matter jurisdiction, or where the trial court attempts to exceed the scope of its jurisdiction although having jurisdiction over the subject matter, and only in circumstances where the petitioner has no other plain, speedy and adequate remedy.
Osborne v. District Court of Ninth Judicial Dist., 654 P.2d 124,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 404

(Wyo. 1982).

Writ of prohibition tests jurisdiction of lower court,

and is available only if no jurisdiction of the subject matter has been afforded to that court, or if having that subject-matter jurisdiction it in some manner exceeds the scope thereof.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Exceptional or extraordinary circumstances may justify issuance

of writ of prohibition.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Court has no jurisdiction to issue writ against state engineer. —

Supreme court has no original jurisdiction to issue writ of prohibition against state engineer to restrain him from holding a threatened hearing seeking to cancel a permit to construct a reservoir, the state engineer not being an “inferior court” within the constitution. State ex rel. Leazenby v. True, 26 Wyo. 314, 184 P. 229,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1919).

Adequate remedy by application to court in course of appeal. —

Prohibition will not lie to prevent court requiring party garnishing judgment debtors to give judgment creditors bond, application to court in course of appeal being adequate remedy. State ex rel. Jones v. District Court, 37 Wyo. 516, 263 P. 700,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1928).

Right of appeal from final orders and judgments is usually adequate remedy,

especially if there is no showing of harassment or that undue hardship would result, or that no apparent cause of action has been asserted.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

Mistake not justifying resort to prohibition. —

A mistaken exercise of jurisdiction or of its acknowledged powers by an inferior court will not justify resort to the extraordinary remedy of prohibition.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

An error or mistake in practice affords no foundation for the writ of prohibition unless it involves the doing of something which is contrary to the laws of the land.
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court of Jackson, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977).

VII.Certiorari.

Common-law writ. —

The writ of certiorari is a common-law writ, and under the power conferred by the constitution, the supreme court has authority to issue it, at least in cases not coming within the operation of the statute abolishing it, subject to the conditions and limitations controlling the writ at common law.
Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Writ of certiorari is not one of right,

and its issuance is discretionary with the court, though such discretion should not be exercised arbitrarily or capriciously.
Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Considering notice of appeal as petition for writ of certiorari. —

There is no inhibition in the court rules, the state constitution or any legislative mandate that precludes the supreme court from, on its own motion, considering a notice of appeal as a petition for writ of certiorari and proceeding with review on that basis. Whenever the court determines that review by certiorari is in the best interest of the state, or its citizens, it may be invoked. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

Although a district court's order annulling a municipal candidate's election was not appealable because it granted only partial summary judgment and was not certified as immediately appealable by the district court, the supreme court converted the notice of appeal into a writ of review because the issues raised presented questions of significant state importance. Smith v. Brito, 2007 WY 191, 173 P.3d 351,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 2007).

Important state question or issue of public significance. —

The supreme court's power of certiorari is invoked when a case from a lower court involves an important state question or is of sufficient public significance to justify a determination by the supreme court. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

Certiorari should be granted without hesitation when the timely resolution of matters coming to the supreme court's attention is of extreme and lasting importance to the citizens of the state and may contribute to judicial efficiency. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

Rule 13.02 (now see Rule 13.01), W.R.A.P, should be followed

by litigants who seek a writ of certiorari, but it is not binding on the supreme court when it elects to grant the writ on its own motion. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

Existence of another adequate remedy. —

Writ of certiorari is not ordinarily granted if there is another plain, speedy and adequate remedy and if there is no question of jurisdiction or excess thereof. Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1954).

The writ will not as a rule be granted where other adequate remedies are open to the petitioner.
Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Review pursuant to certiorari is never granted lightly, especially if an adequate alternative remedy is available. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

The grant of a writ of certiorari not sought by petition is rare, and it will not serve as a substitute for a proper appeal if that is the appropriate remedy. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water, 803 P.2d 61,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1990).

Where no appeal provided. —

A writ of certiorari would seem ordinarily not to be improper in cases in which no appeal has been provided from proceedings before a judicial or quasi judicial tribunal, at least in cases in which such tribunal had no jurisdiction or acted in excess of jurisdiction. Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1954).

Where right of appeal has been lost. —

Where petitioners had entered an appeal from a judgment of the district court denying them the right to water service from a town, and had withdrawn their appeal in reliance on the oral promise of the town officers that their property would be annexed to the town, which promise was not kept, certiorari would not issue to review the judgment of the district court, since no question of jurisdiction was involved, the remedy by appeal from the judgment of the district court was plain, speedy and adequate, and the loss of such remedy by failure to perfect the appeal was due in part at least to petitioners' own fault. Call v. Afton, 73 Wyo. 271, 278 P.2d 270,

1954 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1954).

Review action of district court on appeal from conviction in municipal court. —

The supreme court had authority to issue a writ of certiorari to review the action of the district court in reviewing a conviction in a municipal court for violation of a city ordinance, where the contention was that the district court had no jurisdiction of the appeal.
Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Supreme court may issue writ of certiorari to municipal court

for the purpose of reviewing a ruling of the judges of that court that a statute is unconstitutional.
Laramie v. Mengel, 671 P.2d 340,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 383

(Wyo. 1983).

District court abuse of discretion correctible. —

In the exercise of its discretionary review of a matter on a writ of certiorari, the supreme court may order relief to correct an abuse of district court discretion. V-1 Oil Co. v. Ranck, 767 P.2d 612,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1989).

§ 4. Supreme court generally; number; election of chief justice; quorum; vacancies in supreme court or district court; judicial nominating commission; terms; standing for retention in office.

The supreme court of the state shall consist of not less than three nor more than five justices as may be determined by the legislature. The justices of the court shall elect one of their number to serve as chief justice for such term and with such authority as shall be prescribed by law. A majority of the justices shall constitute a quorum, and a concurrence of a majority of such quorum shall be sufficient to decide any matter. If a justice of the supreme court for any reason shall not participate in hearing any matter, the chief justice may designate one of the district judges to act for such nonparticipating justice.

A vacancy in the office of justice of the supreme court or judge of any district court or of such other courts that may be made subject to this provision by law, shall be filled by a qualified person appointed by the governor from a list of three nominees that shall be submitted by the judicial nominating commission. The commission shall submit such a list not later than 60 days after the death, retirement, tender of resignation, removal, failure of an incumbent to file a declaration of candidacy or certification of a negative majority vote on the question of retention in office under section [subsection] (g) hereof. If the governor shall fail to make any such appointment within 30 days from the day the list is submitted to him, such appointment shall be made by the chief justice from the list within 15 days.

There shall be a judicial nominating commission for the supreme court, district courts and any other courts to which these provisions may be extended by law. The commission shall consist of seven members, one of whom shall be the chief justice, or a justice of the supreme court designated by the chief justice to act for him, who shall be chairman thereof. In addition to the chief justice, or his designee, three resident members of the bar engaged in active practice shall be elected by the Wyoming state bar and three electors of the state not admitted to practice law shall be appointed by the governor to serve on said commission for such staggered terms as shall be prescribed by law. No more than two members of said commission who are residents of the same judicial district may qualify to serve any term or part of a term on the commission. In the case of courts having less than statewide authority, each judicial district not otherwise represented by a member on the commission, and each county, should the provisions hereof be extended by law to courts of lesser jurisdiction than district courts, shall be represented by two nonvoting advisors to the commission when an appointment to a court in such unrepresented district, or county, is pending; both of such advisors shall be residents of the district, or county, and one shall be a member of the bar appointed by the governing body of the Wyoming state bar and one shall be a nonattorney advisor appointed by the governor.

No member of the commission excepting the chairman shall hold any federal, state or county public office or any political party office, and after serving a full term he shall not be eligible for reelection or reappointment to succeed himself on the commission. No member of the judicial nominating commission shall be eligible for appointment to any judicial office while he is a member of the commission nor for a period of one year after the expiration of his term for which he was elected or appointed. Vacancies in the office of commissioner shall be filled for the unexpired terms in the same manner as the original appointments. Additional qualifications of members of the commission may be prescribed by law.

The chairman of the commission shall cast votes only in the event of ties. The commission shall operate under rules adopted by the supreme court. Members of the commission shall be entitled to no compensation other than expenses incurred for travel and subsistence while attending meetings of the commission.

The terms of supreme court justices shall be eight years and the terms of district court judges shall be six years.

Each justice or judge selected under these provisions shall serve for one year after his appointment and until the first Monday in January following the next general election after the expiration of such year. He shall, at such general election, stand for retention in office on a ballot which shall submit to the appropriate electorate the question whether such justice or judge shall be retained in office for another term or part of a term, and upon filing a declaration of candidacy in the form and at the times prescribed by law, he shall, at the general election next held before the expiration of each term, stand for retention on such ballots. The electorate of the whole state shall vote on the question of retention or rejection of justices of the supreme court, and any other statewide court; the electorate of the several judicial districts shall vote on the question of retention or rejection of judges of their respective districts, and the electorate of such other subdivisions of the state as shall be prescribed by law shall vote on the question of retention or rejection of any other judges to which these provisions may be extended.

A justice or judge selected hereunder, or one that is in office upon the effective date of this amendment, who shall desire to retain his judicial office a succeeding term, following the expiration of his existing term of office, shall file with the appropriate office not more than 6 months nor less than 3 months before the general election to be held before the expiration of his existing term of office a declaration of intent to stand for election for a succeeding term. When such a declaration of intent is filed, the appropriate electorate shall vote upon a nonpartisan judicial ballot on the question of retention in or rejection from office of such justice or judge, and if a majority of those voting on the question vote affirmatively, the justice or judge shall be elected to serve the succeeding term prescribed by law. If a justice or judge fails to file such a declaration within the time specified, or if a majority of those voting on the question vote negatively to any judicial candidacy, a vacancy will thereby be created in that office at the end of its existing term. (As amended by Laws 1957, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 455; Laws 1971, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 719; Laws 1975, House Joint Resolution No. 17, p. 471.)

Cross references. —

For additional provision concerning judicial nominating commission, see §

5-1-102

.

As to number of justices and chief justice of the supreme court, see §

5-2-102

.

For amount of salaries of justices of supreme court, see §

9-3-101

.

As to definition of “qualified elector,” see § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

As to terms of office and offices voted on at general elections, see §

22-2-105

.

For provisions dealing with nonpartisan election ballots, see §§

22-6-123

to

22-6-127

.

As to filling vacancies in the office of justice of the supreme court or judge of district court, see §

22-18-110

.

Policy regarding filling vacancies. —

It is the evident policy of the state constitution to fill remaining portions of unexpired terms of officers in cases of vacancy, as far as practicable, at general elections. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893); State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Applied

in

County Court Judges Ass'n v. Sidi, 752 P.2d 960 (Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(1908); Phelan v. Cheyenne Brick Co., 26 Wyo. 493, 188 P. 354,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1920); Wyoming Bancorporation v. Bonham, 527 P.2d 432,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 240

(Wyo. 1974).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Judicial Merit Retention in Wyoming: An Analysis and Some Suggestions for Reform,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 567 (1980).

For article, “Basic Appellate Practice: A Guide to Perfecting an Appeal in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 537 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).

§ 5. Voluntary retirement and compensation of justices and judges.

Subject to the further provisions of this section, the legislature shall provide for the voluntary retirement and compensation of justices and judges of the supreme court and district courts, and may do so for any other courts, on account of length of service, age and disability, and for their reassignment to active duty where and when needed. The office of every such justice and judge shall become vacant when the incumbent reaches the age of seventy (70) years, as the legislature may prescribe; but, in the case of an incumbent whose term of office includes the effective date of this amendment, this provision shall not prevent him from serving the remainder of said term nor be applicable to him before his period or periods of judicial service shall have reached a total of six (6) years. The legislature may also provide for benefits for dependents of justices and judges. (As amended by Laws 1971, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 719.)

Cross references. —

As to retirement of judges of the supreme court and district courts, see §

5-1-106

.

As to assignment of retired judges to district courts in cases of emergency, see §

5-3-107

.

Editor’s notes. —

Joint Resolution 1, 2022 Budget Session, proposes to amend the Wyoming Constitution by amending the retirement age requirements for Wyoming supreme court justices and district court judges. The proposal to amend the Wyoming Constitution, Article 5, Section 5 is proposed for submission to the electors of the State of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the Constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors at the election.

The Secretary of State endorsed the following statement on the proposed amendment:

Currently, the Wyoming Constitution requires Wyoming Supreme Court justices and district court judges to retire upon reaching the age of seventy (70). This amendment increases the mandatory retirement age of Supreme Court justices and district court judges from age seventy (70) to age seventy-five (75).

The Constitution also currently provides an exception to the mandatory requirement to retire upon reaching age seventy (70) for justices and judges who had not yet completed six (6) years of judicial service as of December 12, 1972. The proposed amendment would remove the now-obsolete six (6) year service guarantee.

Cited

in

Jackson v. State, 624 P.2d 751,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 277

(Wyo. 1981); State v. Hat Bar Cattle Co. (In re General Adjudication of All Rights to Use Water in the Big Horn River Sys.), 2015 WY 126,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Sept. 16, 2015); Robert L. Kroenlein Trust v. Kirchhefer, 2015 WY 127,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Sept. 17, 2015); Scherf v. State (In re Scherf), 2015 WY 130,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Sept. 23, 2015); Pope v. Rosenberg, 2015 WY 142,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Nov. 12, 2015); N. Fork Land & Cattle, LLLP v. First Am. Title Ins. Co., 2015 WY 150,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Nov. 24, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Ousting the Judge: Campaign Politics in the 1984 Wyoming Judicial Retention Elections,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 371 (1989).